Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Local Option Budgeting Law of 1993

5-12-201. Short title — Applicability.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Local Option Budgeting Law of 1993” and applies only to any county having adopted its provisions by approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Local Option Budgeting Law and Private Act, OAG 00-059, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 60 (4/3/00).

5-12-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Budget committee” refers only to a budget committee created by law, such as being created according to the County Financial Management System of 1981, compiled in chapter 21 of this title, the County Budgeting Law of 1957, compiled in part 1 of this chapter, or similar provision, or created by private act;

“Chief administrative officer of the county highway department” means the officer or entity having the general control and authority over the county highway department in accordance with § 54-7-109;

“County mayor or budget committee,” in counties not having a budget committee as referred to in subdivision (1), means the county mayor; and

“Long-term debt” means debt payable after June 30 of the fiscal year, for which the budget is applicable.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-203. Applicability.

This part applies to each department, office or agency funded, in whole or in part, from county appropriations. Nevertheless, with regard to entities receiving county funds pursuant to § 5-9-109, only the requested county appropriation and expenditures of county funds shall be included within this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 3.

5-12-204. Duties of comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee not precluded.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as precluding the duties of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee pursuant to §§ 9-11-116 and 9-21-403.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 4; 2010, ch. 868, § 12.

5-12-205. Conflicts with other laws.

If a county included in this part has adopted the County Financial Management System of 1981, compiled in chapter 21 of this title, the County Budgeting Law of 1957, compiled in part 1 of this chapter, or private acts, and such county does not revoke or repeal such act, in the event of a conflict between this part and such acts, this part shall not supersede those acts, except that § 5-12-210 shall supersede any other law.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 5.

5-12-206. Forms on which to submit a proposed budget.

The county mayor of each county shall furnish to the head of each department, office or agency covered by this part, on or before February 1 of each year, budget forms on which to submit a proposed budget. Such forms shall contain the minimum requirements prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury, and shall include space for additional information desired by the county mayor and such additional information desired by the budget committee in counties having a budget committee.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 6; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-207. County mayor to furnish an estimate of revenue.

The county mayor shall furnish to the director of schools and to the chief administrative officer of the county highway department an estimate of the amount of revenue to be generated by one cent (1¢) of the county property tax for each taxing jurisdiction for the ensuing fiscal year and a form tax rate resolution on or before March 15 of each year. The assessor of property shall furnish such assessor's best estimate of the actual assessed value of all taxable property within the county for the ensuing year to the county mayor before March 15 of each year.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 7; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-208. Each department head to provide proposed budget document.

The head of each department, office or agency covered by this part shall provide the county mayor or, if a director of accounts and budgets, director of finance, or similar person is provided by law, then to such official, with a proposed budget document on the budget forms on or before March 1 of each year.

The director of schools and the chief administrative officer of the county highway department shall file, with the proposed budget, a proposed tax rate on the tax rate resolution form necessary to fund the requested budget of the department. The proposed budget submitted by these officials shall include estimated total revenues and other resources sufficient to fund the total proposed appropriations. Appropriations shall be included in an amount sufficient to fund the annual county debt service requirements.

The county mayor or budget committee shall allow any department, office, or agency to alter or amend the submitted budget at any time prior to when the proposed budget is submitted to the county legislative body. The county mayor or budget committee may allow submission of amendments after the budget is submitted to the county legislative body, but not later than the adoption of the budget.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2016, ch. 1080, §§ 10, 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “March 1 of each year” for “April 1 of each year” at the end of (a); and, in (c), substituted “prior to when the proposed budget is submitted to the county legislative body” for “prior to May 15, or such other time as the proposed budget is submitted to the county legislative body, whichever occurs first” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “but not later than the adoption of the budget” for “but not later than June 15 or the adoption of the budget, whichever occurs first” at the of the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “Each alteration or amendment must be submitted in writing.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-209. Review of proposed budgets — Presentation to county legislative body.

On or before June 1 of each year, the county mayor or budget committee shall consolidate and review the various department, office and agency budgets, and other proposed appropriations, if any. Any change in the budget proposed by the county mayor or budget committee shall be reviewed by the county mayor or budget committee with the affected officer or department or agency head, and an attempt will be made to arrive at a mutually acceptable budget amount. If the county mayor or budget committee reaches agreement with the affected officers, department and agency heads, then this change shall be reflected in the consolidated budget and accompanying property tax rate resolution and appropriation resolution, which shall be presented to the county legislative body. If the county mayor or budget committee cannot reach agreement with any affected officer or department or agency head concerning the budget of the office, department or agency, then the consolidated budget shall be presented to the county legislative body with the original proposed budget for the office, department or agency affected, and the county mayor or budget committee shall submit the proposed budget changes in a separate accompanying document, or as an additional column of information in the consolidated budget, and shall also submit this with a property tax rate resolution and appropriation resolution. The county mayor or budget committee shall outline the proposed changes to the consolidated budget and shall state the reasons for the proposed changes in a budget message to the county legislative body.

The county mayor or budget committee may propose changes to the consolidated budget, the property tax rate resolution and appropriation resolution until the same are approved by the county legislative body, or until July 15, whichever occurs first.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 9; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-210. Adoption of budget, tax rate and appropriation resolution.

The county legislative body shall each year adopt a budget, tax rate and appropriation resolution on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight of the earlier of the date provided in any private act, or applicable under the County Financial Management System of 1981, compiled in chapter 21 of this title; or applicable under the County Budgeting Law of 1957, compiled in part 1 of this chapter; or July 31, for the fiscal year beginning on the first day of such July. Nevertheless, if the budget, tax rate and appropriation resolution are not adopted by the county legislative body on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight on June 30 for the ensuing fiscal year, all departments and offices of the county may make expenditures according to the budget of that department or office as adopted for the preceding fiscal year, except that such departments and offices are limited to expenditures and obligations based on a monthly allotment from the preceding fiscal year's budget.

If the county legislative body and the county school board fail to agree upon a budget for the county department of education by August 31 of any year, then, by operation of law, the budget for the county department of education shall be equal to the minimum budget required to comply with the local match and maintenance of effort provisions of the BEP. However, if for three (3) consecutive years, the county legislative body and school board fail to agree upon a budget and the department of education receives the minimum required funding for that fiscal year by operation of law, then, the budget in the third year shall include a mandatory increase that is equivalent to three percent (3%) of the required funding from local sources for schools; provided, however, this increase shall not be required if during any of those three (3) years the school board failed to submit its budget proposals in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-208.

If the county legislative body fails to adopt a budget, property tax resolution, and appropriation resolution by August 31 of any year, then by operation of law, the operating budget for the ensuing fiscal year, other than the portion for the county department of education, shall be the consolidated budget with proposed amendments submitted by the county mayor or the budget committee.

All budget proposals, including the consolidated budget proposal submitted by the county mayor or budget committee and the budget as finally adopted, shall establish the number and salaries of all full-time personnel authorized therein.

The budget as adopted shall be balanced as to all funds.

The setting of the tax rate, by approval of the county legislative body, by operation of law, or otherwise according to law, constitutes a valid tax levy for collection purposes in accordance with this part.

The board of education, through its designated representative, has the right to address the county legislative body in regard to the board's budget and tax rate proposals.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 10; 1996, ch. 697, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2016, ch. 1080, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) If the county legislative body fails to adopt a budget, property tax rate resolution and appropriation resolution by August 15 of any year, then the portion of the consolidated budget for the county department of education, as proposed by the board of education or modified with the agreement of the board of education, and the accompanying property tax rate for education and the appropriation for the county department of education, embodied in the submitted resolutions, shall become effective by operation of law for the ensuing fiscal year. If the county legislative body fails to adopt a budget, property tax rate resolution and appropriation resolution by August 15 of any year, then the operating budget for the ensuing fiscal year, other than the portion for the county department of education, shall be the consolidated budget with proposed amendments submitted by the county mayor or the budget committee.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. May 20, 2016.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Local Option Budgeting Law and Private Act, OAG 00-059, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 60 (4/3/00).

5-12-211. Right to petition for additional deputies and assistants not precluded.

The budget shall have attached to it any court order or letter of agreement setting forth the number of authorized deputies and assistants pursuant to title 8, chapter 20, for the trustee, clerks of courts, register of deeds, county clerk and sheriff. Nothing in this part precludes the trustee, clerks of courts, register of deeds or county clerk from the right to petition the appropriate court for necessary deputies and assistants pursuant to title 8, chapter 20, nor is the right of the sheriff, as provided in § 8-20-120, precluded by this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 11.

5-12-212. Requests for budget amendment — Approval.

When the budget has been adopted, whether by action of the county legislative body or by operation of law, any budget amendment requested by any department to appropriate local, state or federal revenues, received in excess of the estimates used to adopt the budget, may be approved by a majority vote of the county legislative body. Notwithstanding, any department requesting such approval shall give written notice to the county mayor at least seven (7) calendar days prior to consideration of the request by the county legislative body. Other amendments shall be approved as provided in § 5-12-213.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 12; 1994, ch. 656, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-213. Who may make amendments to the budget — Compliance with court orders.

Amendments to line items within a major category of the budget may be made by the official or department head of the office or department whose budget is to be amended, including those county officials named in § 5-12-211, and by the assessor of property, upon written notice to the county mayor and the county legislative body. Any line item amendment that in any way affects amounts budgeted for personnel costs, however, shall require approval of the county mayor to be effective, or if the county mayor disapproves or fails to take action on the amendment within seven (7) calendar days after written submission of the amendment, the county legislative body may approve the amendment by a two-thirds (2/3) vote.

Amendments to line items within major categories of the budget for departments other than the school department, highway department, the officials named in § 5-12-211 or the assessor may be made with approval of the county mayor and a committee of the county legislative body specifically authorized by law or authorized by the county legislative body to approve such amendments. If no committee is created or the committee disapproves or fails to approve the requested line item amendment within twenty-one (21) days after written submission of the request to the chair of the committee, the amendment may be approved by the county legislative body. However, if amendments to the line items within major appropriation categories of the budget are not approved by the county mayor, or the county mayor fails to take action within seven (7) calendar days after written submission of the amendment to the county mayor, such amendment may be subsequently approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.

When the budget has been adopted, whether by action of the county legislative body or by operation of law, amendments to major categories of the budget may be made with the approval of the county mayor, or a committee appointed by the county mayor, and passage of the amendment by a majority vote of the county legislative body. If the county mayor, or the committee appointed by the mayor, does not approve the amendments to the major appropriation categories of the budget, or if the county mayor, or the committee appointed by the mayor, fails to take action on the amendment within seven (7) calendar days after written submission of the amendment to the county mayor, such amendment may be subsequently approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body. The amendments to major categories of the budget must be submitted in writing to the county mayor and the county legislative body and shall specify the following:

A description of the amendment, including the purpose of the amendment and why it is needed during the current fiscal year;

A statement showing the cost of the amendment by budget line item with subclassifications showing specific cost elements (personnel, salaries, equipment, etc., included in the line item); and

Funding sources for the expenditure itemized by federal sources, state sources, local sources or fund balance.

All amendments to the budget of the school department shall first be approved by the county board of education, and all amendments to the budget of the county highway department shall first be approved by the chief administrative officer of the county highway department.

Notwithstanding, amendments shall be made to comply with any court order entered pursuant to title 8, chapter 20.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 13; 1994, ch. 656, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2020, ch. 697, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the first and second sentences of (a)(3), which read: “(3) When the budget has been adopted, whether by action of the county legislative body or by operation of law, amendments to major categories of the budget may be made with the approval of the county mayor and passage of the amendment by a majority vote of the county legislative body. If amendments to the major appropriation categories of the budget are not approved by the county mayor, or the county mayor fails to take action on the amendment within seven (7) calendar days after written submission of the amendment to the county mayor, such amendment may be subsequently approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 697, § 2. June 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-214. Approval of appropriation for capital expenditures to be financed by long-term debt.

Any appropriation for capital expenditures to be financed by long-term debt shall not be expended or obligated until the issuance of the long-term debt has been approved by the county legislative body and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee as required by law.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 14; 2010, ch. 868, § 13.

5-12-215. Impoundment power to prevent deficit operation — Override — Applicability.

If at any time the county mayor determines that the revenues or other resources are, with respect to any fund, less than was anticipated in the adopted budget, or if unanticipated expenditures arise that will likely create a budget deficit, the county mayor, upon certification to each member of the county legislative body, may impound such appropriation as may be necessary to prevent deficit operation. Such impoundment power may be overridden by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body, if the county legislative body makes such amendments at the same meeting to the budget as may be necessary to prevent deficit operation. Such necessary amendment requires a majority vote of the county legislative body. Notwithstanding this section, there shall be no impoundment of funds previously appropriated to the trustee, clerks of courts, register of deeds, county clerk, assessor of property or sheriff.

This section is inapplicable to counties having impoundment provisions under other provisions of law.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 15; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Local Option Budgeting Law and Private Act, OAG 00-059, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 60 (4/3/00).

5-12-216. Modification of dates.

If good cause is shown, such as, but not limited to, a reappraisal of property within the county, the comptroller of the treasury may, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, modify any dates required under this part in a particular county.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 16.

5-12-217. Creation of a revenue fluctuation major category.

The county legislative body may, in its discretion and with the approval of the county mayor, county board of education, or chief administrative officer of the county highway department whose budget is affected, create a reservation of fund balance for such revenue fluctuations for any fund or funds. Such reservation of revenue fluctuations shall be available to fund shortfalls in revenue or to meet unforeseen increases in operating expenses, or both.

Acts 1993, ch. 431, § 17; 1994, ch. 656, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.